Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1402
Terms, defined.

As used in the Joint Public Power Authority Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Agency shall mean any public body, authority, or commission which is engaged in the generation, transmission, or distribution of electric power and energy and which issues indebtedness;

(2) Bonds shall mean electric revenue bonds, notes, warrants, certificates, or other obligations of indebtedness of a joint authority issued under the Joint Public Power Authority Act and shall include refunding bonds and notes issued pending permanent revenue bond financing;

(3) Cost or cost of a project shall mean, but shall not be limited to, the cost of acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, or extension of any project, including the cost of studies, plans, specifications, surveys, and estimates of related costs and revenue; the cost of land, land rights, rights-of-way, easements, water rights, fees, permits, approvals, licenses, certificates, franchises, and the preparation of applications for and securing the same; administrative, legal, engineering, and inspection expenses; financing fees, expenses, and costs; working capital; initial fuel costs; interest on the bonds during the period of construction and for such reasonable period thereafter as may be determined by the joint authority; establishment of reserves; and all other expenditures of the joint authority incidental, necessary, or convenient to the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, improvement, enlargement, or extension of any project and the placing of such project in operation;

(4) Governing body shall mean the board of directors of a public power district;

(5) Joint authority shall mean a public body and body corporate and politic organized in accordance with the Joint Public Power Authority Act;

(6) Public power district shall mean a public power district organized under or subject to Chapter 70, article 6; and

(7) Project shall mean any system or facilities for the generation, transmission, and transformation, or any combination thereof, of electric power and energy by any means whatsoever including, but not limited to, any one or more electric generating units situated at a particular site or any interest in any of the foregoing or any right to the output, capacity, use, or services of such units, any system or facilities for the production, storage, or distribution of hydrogen, or any system or facilities for the production or distribution of ethanol.

Laws 1982, LB 852, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 1230, § 51;

Laws 2005, LB 139, § 19.